Massachusetts, session 194th, H3479.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1.
1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, and standing firmly in
support of the goal to increase the generation of electrical power from renewable sources, the
Commonwealth of Massachusetts directs the developers of offshore wind power projects to site
the related onshore infrastructure on coastal locations that are industrial in nature and/or that
contain existing power plants, whether they be active or decommissioned.
2. It is the direction of the Commonwealth that no such offshore wind projects should
come ashore on or underneath public beaches, parks, recreation areas or conservation lands, or in
small residential communities whose economies are based on tourism.
3. Such infrastructure shall include but not be limited to high voltage power cables,
splicing vaults installed beneath public parking lots and public and private roadways, concrete
duct banks conveying high voltage power cables beneath public and private roadways, and
of 2

electric substations newly constructed or rebuilt to take the electricity generated by offshore
wind turbines.
4. Such infrastructure, especially including but not limited to electric substations, should
never be situated on top of a sole source aquifer and on or adjacent to wellhead protection zones,
where any explosion or leak of toxic dielectric cooling fluids could prove catastrophic and a
long-lasting threat to public health and safety.
5. Prior to accepting any new bids for offshore wind development, including the ongoing
Section 83C Round 4 Offshore Wind Procurement, the Executive Office of Energy and
Environmental Affairs (EEA) is directed to:
a. Review and evaluate independent studies of coordinated offshore transmission
solutions, analyses and any such other studies and other recognized experts that are deemed
credible and relevant; and
b. Report the results of such EEA review and evaluation, including EEA’s assessment of
the potential cost savings to electric utility ratepayers of coordinated offshore transmission
solutions in public session to the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court and to
the Massachusetts voters at large.
6. Furthermore, each of the Energy Facilities Siting Board (EFSB) and any related
commission or permitting agency of the Commonwealth is directed not to consider, hold
hearings on, approve or issue any permits for such projects that contravene the intentions stated
herein.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2